Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6. Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.
§ 20-121.03. Identifying information confidential; separate addendum.

Any petition, pleading, motion, order, or decree filed under this chapter, including any agreements of the parties or transcripts, shall not contain the social security number of any party or of any minor child of any party, or any financial information of any party that provides identifying account numbers for specific assets, liabilities, accounts, or credit cards. Such information if required by law to be provided to a governmental agency or required to be recorded for the benefit or convenience of the parties, shall be contained in a separate addendum filed by the attorney or party. Such separate addendum shall be used to distribute the information only as required by law. Such addendum shall otherwise be made available only to the parties, their attorneys, and to such other persons as the court in its discretion may allow. The attorney or party who prepares or submits a petition, pleading, motion, agreement, order, or decree shall ensure that any information protected pursuant to this section is removed prior to filing with the clerk and that any separate addendum is incorporated by reference into the petition, pleading, motion, agreement, order or decree. The clerk has the authority to reject any petition, pleading, motion, agreement, order, or decree for recordation as a land record that does not comply with the provisions of this section.

(2005, c. 500; 2006, c. 734; 2007, cc. 548, 626.)

The 2006 amendments.

- The 2006 amendment by c. 734 added the language beginning "and that any separate addendum" to the end of the last sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

- The 2007 amendments by cc. 548 and 626 are identical, and added the last sentence.

§ 20-121.1. Reinstatement of suit.

In any suit which has been stricken from the docket, and in which complete relief has not been obtained, upon the motion or application of either party to the original proceedings, the same shall be reinstated upon the docket for such purposes as may be necessary to grant full relief to all parties.

(1948, p. 540; Michie Suppl. 1948, § 5115.)

§ 20-121.2. Validation of absolute divorce granted where no decree from bed and board.

Any absolute divorce granted in this Commonwealth under circumstances in which the bill of complaint prayed for a divorce from bed and board with leave to merger the same into an absolute divorce at the end of the statutory period and in which the decree of absolute divorce was entered with no decree from bed and board because the statutory period elapsed prior to the entry of said decree, is hereby validated, provided such divorce proceeding was otherwise conducted according to law.

(1956, c. 136.)

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1956 act having assigned no number.

§ 20-121.3. Validation of certain divorces granted prior to April 23, 1962.

Every divorce granted by any court of record of this Commonwealth prior to April 23, 1962, and otherwise valid shall be valid notwithstanding the fact that depositions were taken, and not continued or adjourned, on a date other than that specified in the notice to take depositions.

(1970, c. 414.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
39.

§ 20-121.4. Restoration of former name.

Upon decreeing a divorce from the bond of matrimony the court shall, on motion of a party who changed his or her name by reason of the marriage, restore such party's former name or maiden name by separate order meeting the requirements of § 8.01-217.

(1979, c. 1; 1990, c. 569; 2003, c. 258.)

The 2003 amendments.

- The 2003 amendment by c. 258 deleted "either as part of the final decree or, upon request of such party" following "maiden name."

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

§ 20-122. Advertising offer to obtain divorces.

Whosoever prints, publishes, distributes, or circulates, or causes to be printed, published, distributed, or circulated, any circular, pamphlet, card, handbill, advertisement, printed paper, book, newspaper, or notice of any kind, offering to procure, or aid in procuring, any divorce, or the severance, dissolution, or annulment of any marriage, either in this Commonwealth or elsewhere, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor, and on conviction thereof shall be fined not less than $190 nor more than $300, provided that the provisions of this section shall not apply to a duly licensed attorney-at-law, partnership composed of duly licensed attorneys-at-law or a professional corporation incorporated for the practice of law so long as such attorney, partnership or professional corporation conducts such advertisement in accordance with the Rules of Court promulgated by the Supreme Court of Virginia. This section shall not apply to the printing or publishing of any notice or advertisement required or authorized by any law of this Commonwealth or orders of any court.

(Code 1919, § 5116; 1975, c. 644; 1979, c. 438.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 2A M.J. Attorney and Client,
§
56.

§ 20-123.

Repealed by Acts 1964, c. 99.

§ 20-124. Sequestration of record.

Upon motion of a party to any suit under this chapter, the court may order the record thereof or any agreement of the parties, filed therein, to be sealed and withheld from public inspection and thereafter the same shall only be opened to the parties, their respective attorneys, and to such other persons as the judge of such court at his discretion decides have a proper interest therein.

(1978, c. 484; 1990, c. 623.)